en: Bobblehead Figures
xx: Bobblehead Figures
cs: Figurky s kývací hlavičkou
da: Nikkedukker
de: Wackelfiguren
es: Muñecos con cabeza oscilante
fr: Figurines à tête mobile
it: Figurine bobblehead
ja: 首振り人形
nl: Ja-knikkende figuurtjes
no: Bobblehead-figurer
pl: Figurki bobblehead
pt: Bobbleheads
ru: Фигурки с качающейся головой
sv: Bobbleheaddockor
tr: Büyük Kafalı Figürler

en: Doll & Action Figure Accessories
xx: Doll & Action Figure Accessories
cs: Panenky a figurky – příslušenství
da: Dukker og actionfigurer – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Puppen & Actionfiguren
es: Accesorios para muñecas y muñecos de acción
fr: Accessoires pour poupées et figurines
it: Accessori bambole e action figure
ja: 人形・アクションフィギュア関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor poppen en actiefiguurtjes
no: Tilbehør til dukker og actionfigurer
pl: Akcesoria do lalek i figurek akcji
pt: Acessórios para bonecas e bonecos de personagens
ru: Принадлежности для кукол
sv: Tillbehör till dockor och actionfigurer
tr: Bebekler ve Aksiyon Figür Aksesuarları

en: Dollhouse Accessories
xx: Dollhouse Accessories
cs: Domečky pro panenky – příslušenství
da: Dukkehuse – tilbehør
de: Puppenhaus-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para casas de muñecas
fr: Accessoires de maison de poupées, Mobilier de poupée
it: Accessori case bambole
ja: ドールハウス関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor poppenhuizen
no: Dukkehustilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do domków dla lalek
pt: Acessórios para casa de bonecas
ru: Принадлежности для кукольных домиков
sv: Tillbehör till dockskåp
tr: Bebek Evi Aksesuarları

en: Dollhouses
xx: Dollhouses
cs: Domečky pro panenky
da: Dukkehuse
de: Puppenhäuser
es: Casitas de muñecas
fr: Maisons de poupées, Maison de poupée
it: Case delle bambole
ja: ドールハウス
nl: Poppenhuizen
no: Dukkehus
pl: Domki dla lalek
pt: Casas de boneca
ru: Кукольные домики
sv: Dockskåp
tr: Bebek Evleri

en: Dolls
xx: Dolls
cs: Panenky
da: Dukker
de: Puppen
es: Muñecas
fr: Poupées, Poupée, Poupon
it: Bambole
ja: 人形
nl: Poppen
no: Dukker
pl: Lalki
pt: Bonecas
ru: Куклы
sv: Dockor
tr: Bebekler

en: Paper & Magnetic Dolls
xx: Paper & Magnetic Dolls
cs: Papírové a magnetické panenky
da: Påklædningsdukker og magnetdukker
de: Papier- & Magnetpuppen
es: Muñecas magnéticas y de papel
fr: Poupées magnétiques
it: Bambole di carta e magnetiche
ja: 紙人形・磁石人形
nl: Papieren en magnetische aankleedpoppetjes
no: Papir- og magnetdukker
pl: Lalki papierowe i magnetyczne
pt: Bonecas de papel e magnéticas
ru: Бумажные и магнитные куклы
sv: Pappers- och magnetiska dockor
tr: Kağıt ve Mıknatıslı Bebekler

en: Puppet & Puppet Theater Accessories
xx: Puppet & Puppet Theater Accessories
cs: Loutky a loutková divadla – příslušenství
da: Marionetdukke og dukketeater – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Puppen & Puppentheater
es: Accesorios para teatro de títeres y marionetas
fr: Accessoires pour théâtres de marionnettes et marionnettes
it: Accessori per burattini e teatro dei burattini
ja: 人形劇関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor poppenkastpoppen en poppenkasten
no: Tilbehør til hånddukker og dukketeater
pl: Akcesoria do pacynek i teatrzyków
pt: Acessórios para fantoches e teatros de fantoches
ru: Принадлежности для марионеток и кукольного театра
sv: Tillbehör till dockor och dockteatrar
tr: Kukla ve Kukla Tiyatrosu

en: Puppet Theaters
xx: Puppet Theaters
cs: Loutková divadla
da: Dukketeatre
de: Puppentheater
es: Teatros de títeres
fr: Théâtres de marionnettes
it: Teatri dei burattini
ja: 人形劇
nl: Poppenkasten
no: Dukketeater
pl: Teatrzyki
pt: Teatros de fantoches
ru: Кукольные театры
sv: Dockteatrar
tr: Kukla Tiyatroları

en: Puppets & Marionettes
xx: Puppets & Marionettes
cs: Loutky
da: Dukker og marionetdukker
de: Marionetten
es: Marionetas
fr: Marionnettes, Marionnette
it: Pupazzetti
ja: あやつり人形・指人形
nl: Handpoppen
no: Hånddukker og marionetter
pl: Pacynki i marionetki
pt: Fantoche e marionetes
ru: Куклы и марионетки
sv: Handdockor och marionetter
tr: Kuklalar

en: Stuffed Animals
xx: Stuffed Animals
cs: Plyšové hračky
da: Tøjdyr
de: Stofftiere
es: Animales de peluche
fr: Peluches, Peluche
it: Orsacchiotti
ja: ぬいぐるみ
nl: Pluchen speelgoed
no: Kosedyr
pl: Pluszaki
pt: Brinquedos de pelúcia
ru: Мягкие игрушки
sv: Mjukisdjur
tr: Dolgu Oyuncak Hayvanlar

en: Toy Playsets
xx: Toy Playsets
cs: Herní sady
da: Legetøjssæt
de: Spielzeugsets
es: Parques infantiles
fr: Sets de jeu
it: Playset
ja: プレイセット
nl: Speelsets
no: Leketøyssett
pl: Zestawy zabawek
pt: Conjuntos
ru: Игровые наборы
sv: Lekset
tr: Oyuncak Setleri

en: Educational Toys
xx: Educational Toys
cs: Vzdělávací hračky
da: Pædagogisk legetøj
de: Lernspielzeug
es: Juguetes educativos
fr: Jouets éducatifs
it: Giocattoli educativi
ja: 知育玩具
nl: Educatief speelgoed
no: Læreleker
pl: Zabawki edukacyjne
pt: Brinquedos educativos
ru: Обучающие игрушки
sv: Pedagogiska leksaker
tr: Eğitici Oyuncaklar

en: Ant Farms
xx: Ant Farms
cs: Mravenčí farmy
da: Myrefarme
de: Ameisenfarmen
es: Granjas de hormigas
fr: Fermes à fourmis
it: Formicai
ja: アリの巣観察セット
nl: Mierenboerderijen
no: Maurkolonier
pl: Farmy mrówek
pt: Fazendas de formigas
ru: Домашние муравейники
sv: Myrfarmer
tr: Karınca Çiftlikleri

en: Astronomy Toys & Models
xx: Astronomy Toys & Models
cs: Astronomické hračky a modely
da: Astronomilegetøj- og modeller
de: Astronomisches Spielzeug und astronomische Modelle
es: Juguetes y modelos de astronomía
fr: Maquettes et jouets d'astronomie
it: Giocattoli e modelli astronomici
ja: 天文おもちゃ、天体モデル
nl: Ruimtespeelgoed en -modellen
no: Vitenskapsleker og -modeller
pl: Zabawki i modele astronomiczne
pt: Modelos e brinquedos relacionados a astronomia
ru: Астрономические модели и игрушки
sv: Astronomileksaker och -modeller
tr: Astronomi Oyuncakları ve Modelleri

en: Bug Collecting Kits
xx: Bug Collecting Kits
cs: Sady pro sběratele brouků
da: Insektglas
de: Insektensammlung
es: Kits para coleccionar insectos
fr: Kits de collecte d'insectes
it: Kit collezione insetti
ja: 昆虫採集キット
nl: Kits voor insecten verzamelen
no: Sett til insektsamling
pl: Zestawy do zbierania owadów
pt: Kits para coletar insetos
ru: Наборы для сбора и изучения насекомых
sv: Insektssamlarkit
tr: Böcek Toplama Kitleri

en: Educational Flash Cards
xx: Educational Flash Cards
cs: Výukové kartičky
da: Huskekort til undervisning
de: Lernkarten
es: Tarjetas educativas
fr: Cartes mémoire pédagogiques
it: Carte educative
ja: フラッシュ カード
nl: Educatieve flashkaarten
no: Informasjonskort til undervisning
pl: Karty edukacyjne
pt: Cartões educativos
ru: Дидактические карточки
sv: Bildkort
tr: Eğitici Flaş Kartlar

en: Reading Toys
xx: Reading Toys
cs: Hračky k výuce čtení
da: Læselegetøj
de: Lesespiele
es: Juguetes de lectura
fr: Jouets d'apprentissage de la lecture
it: Giocattoli per la lettura
ja: 読み書き学習用おもちゃ
nl: Speelgoed voor leesvaardigheid
no: Leseleker
pl: Zabawki do nauki czytania
pt: Brinquedos para leitura
ru: Игрушки для обучения чтению
sv: Läsleksaker
tr: Okuma Oyuncakları

en: Science & Exploration Sets
xx: Science & Exploration Sets
cs: Dětské vědecké sady
da: Videnskabssæt
de: Wissenschaftssets
es: Juegos de ciencias y exploración
fr: Coffrets de science et d'exploration
it: Kit scientifici e di esplorazione
ja: 科学学習セット
nl: Wetenschaps- en ontdekkingssets
no: Eksperimentsett om naturvitenskap
pl: Zabawki naukowe
pt: Conjuntos de ciências e exploração
ru: Детские научные наборы
sv: Vetenskapskit
tr: Bilim ve Keşif Setleri

en: Toy Abacuses
xx: Toy Abacuses
cs: Dětská počítadla
da: Kuglerammer
de: Schieberechner
es: Ábacos de juguete
fr: Abaques
it: Abachi giocattolo
ja: おもちゃのそろばん
nl: Telramen
no: Leke-kulerammer
pl: Liczydła
pt: Ábacos de brinquedo
ru: Игрушечные счёты
sv: Leksakskulramar
tr: Oyuncak Abaküsler

en: Executive Toys
xx: Executive Toys
cs: Hračky pro dospělé
da: Kontorlegetøj
de: Bürospielzeug
es: Juguetes para oficinas
fr: Gadgets de bureau
it: Giochi/passatempo da scrivania
ja: デスクトイ
nl: Bureaugadgets
no: Leker til arbeidsplassen
pl: Zabawki biurowe
pt: Brinquedos para executivos
ru: Сувенирные игрушки
sv: Skrivbordsleksaker
tr: Ofis Oyuncakları